Hawaii statutes.
§425-12 Fee for filing documents and
issuing certificates. (a) The following fees shall be paid to the
director of commerce and consumer affairs upon the filing of general
partnership documents:

(1) Partnership registration statement, $25;

(2) Partnership change of name statement, $10;

(3) Partnership dissolution statement, $10;

(4) Foreign general partnership registration
statement, $25;

(5) Statement of change, $10;

(6) Application for certificate of withdrawal, $5;

(7) Statement of correction, $10;

(8) Reservation of name, $10;

(9) Transfer of reservation of name, $10;

(10) Annual statement for domestic or foreign general
partnership, $10;

(11) Good standing certificate, $5;

(12) Articles of conversion or merger, $100;

(13) Any other statement, certificate, or other
document for a domestic or foreign general partnership, $10;

(14) Special handling fee for review of any general
partnership document, $25;

(15) Special handling fee for certificates issued by
the director, $10 per certificate;

(16) Special handling fee for certification of
documents, $10;

(17) Special handling fee for review of articles of
conversion or merger, $75; and

(18) For filings relating to registered agents, the
fees established by section 425R-2.

(b) The director shall charge and collect:

(1) For furnishing a certified copy of any document,
instrument, or paper relating to a general partnership, $10 for the certificate
and affixing the seal thereto; and

(2) At the time of any service of process on the
director as agent for service of process of a general partnership, $10, which
amount may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the suit or action
causing the service to be made if the party prevails in the suit or action.

(c) All fees collected under this section
shall be managed in accordance with section 26-9(l). [L 1969, c 247, pt of §1;
am L 1979, c 162, §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1985, c
189, §7; am L 1988, c 141, §48; am L 1992, c 6, §7; am L 1996, c 181, §3; am L
1999, c 129, §13 and c 280, §16; am L 2000, c 219, §53; am L 2001, c 129, §70;
am L 2002, c 130, §84; am L 2004, c 116, §6 and c 117, §3; am L 2006, c 184,
§16; am L 2009, c 55, §31]

Cross References

Modification of fees, see §92‑28.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next